Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.010

Washington advanced college tuition payment program—Washington college savings program—Established.

(1) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program is established to help make higher education affordable and accessible to all citizens of the state of Washington by offering a savings incentive that will protect purchasers and beneficiaries against rising tuition costs.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington college savings program is established to provide an additional financial option for individuals, organizations, and families to save for college.

(3) These programs are designed to encourage savings and enhance the ability of Washington citizens to obtain financial access to institutions of higher education. In addition, the programs encourage elementary and secondary school students to do well in school as a means of preparing for and aspiring to higher education attendance. These programs are intended to promote a well-educated and financially secure population to the ultimate benefit of all citizens of the state of Washington.

[ 2016 c 69 s 1; 1997 c 289 s 1.]